Tennessee, session 114, SB2395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 13, Part 6, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) This section is known and may be cited as the "Fourth Amendment is Not for
Sale Act."
(b) A state agency or local governmental entity, or any of its officers, employees,
or contractors, that is required by § 39-13-610 or another law to be issued a warrant
prior to obtaining personal information or sensitive data about an individual shall not
knowingly purchase, license, or otherwise obtain the personal information or sensitive
data from a controller in lieu of the warrant requirement.
(c) A officer, employee, or contractor of a state agency or local governmental
entity who violates subsection (b) commits a Class B misdemeanor.
(d) It is not a violation of subsection (b) if the personal information or sensitive
data is purchased, licensed, or otherwise obtained under any of the following
circumstances:
(1) If necessary to respond to a call for emergency services placed by
the individual to whom the personal information or sensitive data relates;
(2) To prevent imminent danger to the life of the individual to whom the
personal information or sensitive data relates;
(3) To prevent imminent danger to the public;
SB2395
012061
- 1 -

(4) With the express, written consent of the individual to whom the
personal information or sensitive data relates; or
(5) If required by federal law or a valid federal court order.
(e) As used in this section:
(1) "Controller," "identified or identifiable natural person," "natural
person," "individual," "personal information," and "sensitive data" have the same
meanings as defined in § 47-18-3302;
(2) "Local governmental entity" means a municipality, metropolitan
government, county, utility district, local law enforcement agency, school district,
public building authority, and development district created and existing pursuant
to the laws of this state, or any instrumentality of government created by any one
(1) or more of the named local governmental entities; and
(3) "State agency" means a state department, board, commission, and
other body which carries out state functions and programs.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012061